dict/builddict/names.dic
أمريكي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
إثيوبي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
تركي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
يونان/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
تايلند/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
صربي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
غيني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
بلجيكا/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
بوروندي/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
مولدافي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
سنغال/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
جيبوتي/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
سيراليون/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
كوبا/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
فلسطين/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
راوندا/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
أوكراني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
بيروفي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
توغولي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
ملديف/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
موزمبيق/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
صومال/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
ميانمار/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
موريتاني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
بوركنابي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
كمبودي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
سعودية/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
مقدوني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
هندوراس/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
نمسا/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
إنجليزي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
بكين/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
برازافيل/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
داكار/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
هانوي/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
كيغالي/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
لوبمبا/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
مانيلا/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
باريس/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
ساوتومي/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
فيينا/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
نار/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
أرض/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
إمبراطور/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
بديهة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
تونس/ABJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
جنائز/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
محفل/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
خليج/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
زبور/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
أسطورة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
مشارق/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
صخر/ADACABAAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
مظلة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
عصبة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
معمل/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
فراس/ADACABAAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
فندق/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
إقليم/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
ملحمة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
موسيقى/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
نوبة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
وطن/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
برتغال/ADACABAAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
ابتزاز/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
اجتثاث/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
احتكار/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
استسلام/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
استيطان/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
رجعة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
إيمان/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
انفتاح/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
تعاطف/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
توافق/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
تجسيد/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
حقوق/ADACABAAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
رجع/ADACABAAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
سلف/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
تطريب/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
عفو/ADACABAAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
غرب/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
قتال/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
كتابة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
هزل/ADACABAAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
نظر/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
همج/ADACABAAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
وعظ/ADACABAAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
منسي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
دهي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
ذكي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
صحفي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
جنائزي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
نصراني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
فدائي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
معزي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
راديكالي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
أندلسي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
فارسي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
إجرائي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
استبدادي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
آلي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
بدوي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
جامعي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
حكومي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
دولي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
ريفي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
سماوي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
شرقي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
صومالي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
عصري/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
فلكي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
كهربائي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
مالي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
مظلي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
موضوعي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
نفعي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
وحداني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
أوروبي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
تبادلي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
قرشي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
صحي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
آذري/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
تكعيبي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
حنيفي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
إطفائي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
كراعي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
إسلامي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
شعبي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
طبوغرافي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
أخوي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
بحراني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
غوغائي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
فتي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
محي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
مرثي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
منعي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
بروتستيني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
صيدلاني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
غجر/ADACABAAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
بيرقراطي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
ماسوني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
أشعري/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
أرثودكس/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLAJA
يرموك/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
فوسفاط/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNALCLBLAJA
فليبين/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
أكادبمي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
طليطلة/ABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
نابلس/ABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
قرمز/ABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
إسطانبول/ABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
أرسطاطليس/ABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
إليزابيث/ABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
بنغلادش/AAABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
غرناطة/ABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
برشلونة/ABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
بنغلاديش/AAABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
بنجاب/AAABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
أكادير/ABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
تايلاندي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
ثديي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
شوفيني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
خراساني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
عشائري/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
أمريكاني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
حاخامية/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
أنغليكاني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
بروتستانتي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
شيشاني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
بورسوداني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
لاذقي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
تكنيكي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
بنجابي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
علائقي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
إنكلترا/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
أرمني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
أنكلوسكسوني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
بوليسي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
مخابراتي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
كلينيكي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
لاأخلاقي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
دنماركي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
فاروقي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
هيدروكربوني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
أصفهاني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
برهمي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
تعزيمي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
سيكلوجي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
ليبرالي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
لوجستي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
أوسطي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
حسيني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
أرخميدي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
بهيمي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
لاقانوني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
كوستاريكي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
كنائسي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
طقوسي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
عصراني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
إيسلاندي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
بلوتوني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
رفاعي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
ميتري/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
باريزي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
باديسي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
سبئي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
كونجرسي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
حقيقي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
